fr: Type d’anneaux de canne: Anneau anti-emmêlement; Anneau classique; Anneau indéformable; Anneau Low Rider; Anneau ouvert; Anneau à poulie; Poulie de scion; Anneau de départ; Poulie de scion orientable; Monture en fil métallique; Autre
bg-BG: Тип водачи на въдицата: Водач против оплитане; Стандартен пръстен; Устойчив на заплитане водач; Low rider водач; Отворен водач; Ролков водач; Ролков връх; Основен водач (Stripper guide); Въртящ се ролков връх; Телена рамка; Друго
cs: Typ vodítka udice: Očko proti zamotání; Klasický kroužek; Očko odolné proti zaháknutí; Nízké očko (Low rider); Otevřené očko; Rolnové očko; Rolnová špička; Naváděcí očko; Otočná rolnová špička; Drátěný rám; Jiné
hu: Botvezető típusa: Gubancgátló gyűrű; Hagyományos gyűrű; Akadásmentes gyűrű; Low rider gyűrű; Nyitott gyűrű; Görgős gyűrű; Görgős spiccgyűrű; Keverőgyűrű; Forgó görgős spiccgyűrű; Drótkeretes; Egyéb
tr: Olta kılavuzu tipi: Dolaşma önleyici kılavuz; Geleneksel halka; Düğüm önleyici kılavuz; Düşük profilli kılavuz; Açık kılavuz; Makaralı kılavuz; Makaralı uç; Sıyırıcı kılavuz; Döner makaralı uç; Tel çerçeve; Diğer
da: Stangringes type: Anti-tangle-øje; Klassisk ring; Foul-proof-øje; Low rider-øje; Åbent øje; Rulleøje; Rulle-topøje; Stripper-øje; Drejbart rulle-topøje; Trådramme; Andet
ru: Тип колец удилища: Кольцо против захлеста; Классическое кольцо; Незацепляемое кольцо; Низкопрофильное кольцо; Открытое кольцо; Роликовое кольцо; Роликовый тюльпан; Входное кольцо; Поворотный роликовый тюльпан; Проволочная рамка; Другое
pt-BR: Vara de pesca tipo de passador: Passador antienrosco; Anel convencional; Passador à prova de enrosco; Passador low rider; Passador aberto; Passador com roldana; Ponteira com roldana; Passador de saída; Ponteira com roldana giratória; Armação de arame; Outro
th: ประเภทไกด์คันเบ็ด: ไกด์กันสายพัน; ห่วงแบบทั่วไป; ไกด์กันสายตีเกลียว; ไกด์ทรงเตี้ย; ไกด์แบบเปิด; ไกด์ลูกกลิ้ง; ปลายลูกกลิ้ง; ไกด์ตัวล่างสุด; ปลายลูกกลิ้งหมุนรอบทิศทาง; โครงลวด; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Tip vodiča za šipku: Vodilica protiv zapetljavanja; Obični prsten; Vodilica protiv oštećenja; Niska vodilica; Otvorena vodilica; Vodilica s valjkom; Vrh s valjkom; Prva (najveća) vodilica; Okretni vrh s valjkom; Žičani okvir; Ostalo
pl: Typ przelotek wędki: Przelotka antysplątaniowa; Tradycyjna z pierścieniem; Przelotka typu foul-proof; Przelotka typu low rider; Otwarta przelotka; Przelotka rolkowa; Rolkowa przelotka szczytowa; Przelotka startowa (stripper guide); Obrotowa rolkowa przelotka szczytowa; Przelotka druciana; Inne
de: Typ der Rutenringe: Anti-Tangle-Ring; Klassischer Ring; Foul-Proof-Ring; Low-Rider-Ring; Offener Ring; Roller-Ring; Roller-Spitzenring; Leitring; Schwenkbarer Roller-Spitzenring; Drahtrahmen; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tip de inele pentru lansetă: Inel anti-încurcare; Inel convențional; Inel anti-agățare; Inel low rider; Inel deschis; Inel cu rolă; Vârf cu rolă; Inel de plecare; Vârf pivotant cu rolă; Cadru din sârmă; Altele
sk-SK: Typ vodiacich prvkov prúta: Očko proti zamotaniu; Klasické očko; Očko odolné voči zachyteniu; Low rider očko; Otvorené očko; Rolničkové očko; Rolničková špička; Navádzacie očko; Otočná rolničková špička; Drôtené očko; Iné
el: Τύπος οδηγού ράβδου: Οδηγός κατά του μπερδέματος; Συμβατικός δακτύλιος; Οδηγός foul-proof; Οδηγός low rider; Ανοικτός οδηγός; Οδηγός με ράουλο; Μύτη με ράουλο; Οδηγός stripper; Περιστρεφόμενη μύτη με ράουλο; Συρμάτινο πλαίσιο; Άλλο
es: Tipo de guías de la caña: Anilla antienredos; Anilla convencional; Anilla antienganches; Anilla low rider; Anilla abierta; Anilla de rodillo; Puntera de rodillo; Anilla de salida; Puntera de rodillo giratoria; Armazón de alambre; Otro
it: Tipo di guida della canna: Anello antigroviglio; Anello convenzionale; Anello antistrappo; Anello a basso profilo; Anello aperto; Anello a rullino; Apicale a rullino; Anello di partenza; Apicale a rullino girevole; Telaio in filo metallico; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta vodil ribiške palice: Vodilo proti zapletanju; Običajni obroček; Vodilo proti zatikanju; Nizko vodilo; Odprto vodilo; Valjčno vodilo; Valjčna konica; Začetno vodilo; Vrtljiva valjčna konica; Žični okvir; Drugo
ko: 낚싯대 가이드 유형: 엉킴 방지 가이드; 일반 링; 파울 프루프 가이드; 로우 라이더 가이드; 오픈 가이드; 롤러 가이드; 롤러 팁; 스트리퍼 가이드; 스위블 롤러 팁; 와이어 프레임; 기타
zh-CN: 鱼竿导环类型: 防缠绕导环; 传统导环; 防挂导环; 低矮导环; 开放式导环; 滚轮导环; 滚轮顶环; 底导环; 旋转滚轮顶环; 线框; 其他
ja: ロッドガイドタイプ: アンチタングルガイド; コンベンショナルリング; ファウルプルーフガイド; ローライダーガイド; オープンガイド; ローラーガイド; ローラーチップ; ストリッパーガイド; スイベルローラーチップ; ワイヤーフレーム; その他
sv: Typ av linstyrning: Trasselfri spöring; Standardring; Foul-proof-ring; Low rider-ring; Öppen ring; Rullring; Toppögla med trissa; Första spöringen; Svängbar toppögla med trissa; Trådögla; Övrigt
zh-TW: 釣竿導環類型: 防纏繞導環; 傳統導環; 防纏導環; 低架導環; 開放式導環; 滾輪導環; 滾輪頂導環; 導線環; 旋轉滾輪頂導環; 金屬線框; 其他
lt-LT: Meškerės žiedelių tipas: Nesipainiojantis žiedelis; Įprastas žiedelis; Apsaugotas nuo susipainiojimo žiedelis; Žemo profilio žiedelis; Atviras žiedelis; Ratukinis žiedelis; Viršūnėlė su ratuku; Apatinis žiedelis; Sukamoji viršūnėlė su ratuku; Vielinis rėmelis; Kita
fi: Vaparenkaiden tyyppi: Sotkeutumaton vaparengas; Perinteinen rengas; Takertumaton vaparengas; Matala vaparengas; Avoin vaparengas; Rullavaparengas; Rullakärki; Tyvirengas; Kääntyvä rullakärki; Lankakehys; Muu
en: Rod guide type: Anti-tangle guide; Conventional ring; Foul-proof guide; Low rider guide; Open guide; Roller guide; Roller tip; Stripper guide; Swivel roller tip; Wire frame; Other
nb: Stangføringstype: Flokefri stangring; Konvensjonell ring; Flokesikker stangring; Low rider-ring; Åpen ring; Trinsering; Topptrinse; Bunnring; Svingbar topptrinse; Trådramme; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de anilhas da cana: Passador antiemaranhamento; Anel convencional; Passador foul-proof; Passador low rider; Passador aberto; Passador de rolete; Ponta de rolete; Passador de arranque; Ponta de rolete giratória; Estrutura de arame; Outro
nl: Hengel geleideoog type: Anti-tangle-geleideoog; Conventionele ring; Klitvrij geleideoog; Low rider-geleideoog; Open geleideoog; Roller-geleideoog; Roller-topoog; Startoog; Draaibaar roller-topoog; Draadframe; Overige
vi: Loại dẫn hướng cần: Khoen chống rối; Khoen vòng truyền thống; Khoen chống vướng; Khoen gầm thấp; Khoen mở; Khoen con lăn; Đầu cần con lăn; Khoen đề pa; Đầu cần con lăn xoay; Khung dây; Khác